New Mexico, session 2026, SB106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Five million dollars ($5,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the higher education department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to carry out the purposes of the Graduate Scholarship Act. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .232975.1